en: mackerel fillet
bg: филе от скумрия, рибно филе от скумрия
da: makrelfilet
de: Makrelenfilet, Makrelenfilets
es: filete de caballa
fi: makrillifilee, makrillifileetä
fr: filets de maquereaux
hr: file skuše
it: filetti di sgombro
nl: makreelfilet
pl: filet z makreli, filety z makreli
sv: makrillfilé, makrillfiléer

en: precooked mackerel fillet
de: vorgegartes Makrelenfilet
fi: esikypsennetty makrillifilee
fr: filets de maquereaux précuits
hr: prethodno kuhani file skuše
it: filetto di sgombro precotto

en: Atlantic mackerel
ar: اسقمري معروف
cs: makrela obecná
da: atlantisk makrel
de: atlantische Makrele
fa: ماهی خال‌خالی اطلس
fi: atlantin makrilli
fr: Maquereau de l'Atlantique
ga: ronnach an Atlantaigh
hr: scomber-scombrus
hu: Közönséges makréla
it: sgombro dell'Atlantico
ko: 대서양고등어
la: scomber scombrus
lt: Atlantinė skumbrė
lv: Atlantijas makrele
nl: atlantische makreel
pl: Makrela atlantycka
ro: Scrumbia albastră, macroul de Atlantic
ru: Атлантическая скумбрия
sv: atlantisk makrill
uk: Скумбрія атлантична
vi: Cá thu Đại Tây Dương

en: chub mackerel, pacific mackerel, pacific chub mackerel
fr: maquereau espagnol, maquereaux espagnols
hr: scomber japonicus
it: sgombro occhione
la: Scomber japonicus, Scomber colias
nl: Spaanse makreel
pl: makrela kolias, makreli kolias

fr: Filets de maquereaux espagnols
it: Filetti di sgombro occhione
nl: Spaanse makreelfilets
pl: filet z makreli kolias, filety z makreli kolias

en: horse mackerel
bg: сафрид
hr: šur
nl: horsmakrel

en: jack mackerel
ar: طرخورة
be: Стаўрыды
bg: Сафриди
eu: Txitxarro
fa: زبردم‌ها
fi: piikkimakrillit
fr: chinchard
he: טרכון
hr: jack skuša
hy: Ստավրիդներ
ja: アジ、鯵
ka: სტავრიდა
kk: Ставрида
kw: Keynek
la: Trachurus
mk: шарун
pl: Suareus
pt: chicharro
ru: Ставриды
tr: İstavrit
uk: Ставрида
vi: Cá sòng

fr: Filets de chinchards
pt: filetes de carapau

en: freshwater bream, bream
de: brasse
fr: brème
hr: slatkovodna deverika
it: orata d'acqua dolce

en: common bream
ar: أبراميس شائع
az: Çapaq
ba: Ҡорман
be: Лешч
bg: Платика
br: Brell
ca: Brema
cs: Cejn velký
cv: Çупах
cy: Merfog
da: Brasen
de: Brachse
el: Αβραμίδα
eo: Bramo
es: Abramis brama
et: Latikas
eu: Brema
fa: ماهی سیم
fi: Lahna
fr: Brème commune
ga: Bran
gl: Brema
he: לש
hr: deverika
hu: Dévérkeszeg
hy: Բրամ
io: Bremo
it: Abramis brama
ja: ブリーム
ka: კაპარჭინა
kk: Табан балық
ko: 도미
kv: Ёді
ky: Лещ
la: Abramis brama
lt: Paprastasis karšis
lv: Plaudis
nl: Brasem
nn: Brasme
no: Brasme
pl: Leszcz
pt: Abramis brama
ro: Plătică
ru: Лещ
sh: Deverika
sl: Ploščič
sr: Деверика
sv: Braxen
tr: Çapak balığı
tt: Корбан балыгы
uk: Лящ
uz: Leshch
vi: Cá vền
wa: Bråme
zh: 欧鳊

en: threadfin bream, whiptail breams, nemipteridae
af: Nemipteridae
ar: عندقات
ca: Nemiptèrids
de: Scheinschnapper
dv: ކަނޑުއުނިޔަ އާއިލާ
es: Nemipteridae
eu: Nemipteridae
fa: گوازیم‌ماهیان
fi: Pennat
fr: Nemipteridae
gl: Nemiptéridos
he: נימיים
hr: threadfin deverika
id: Nemipteridae
it: Nemipteridae
ja: イトヨリダイ科
ko: 실꼬리돔과
lt: Siūlauodegiai jūrkaršiai
nl: Valse snappers
pl: Nitecznikowate
pt: Nemipteridae
ru: Нитеперовые
sv: Nemipteridae
ta: நெமிட்டெரைடீ
tr: Nemipteridae
uk: Ниткопері
vi: Họ Cá lượng
zh: 金線魚科

en: seabream, seabreams
af: Sparidae
ar: فصيلة الأسبور
be: Марскія карасі
bg: спаридови
ca: Espàrid
de: Meerbrassen
el: Σπαρίδες
eo: Sparedoj
es: dorada
et: Merikogerlased
eu: Sparidae
fa: شانک‌ماهیان
fi: Hammasahvenet
fr: dorade
ga: Deargán
gl: Espáridos
he: ספרוסיים
hi: स्पेरिदे
hr: ljuskavke
hu: Tengeri durbincsfélék
ia: Sparidae
it: Sparidae
ja: タイ科
ka: სპარუსისებრნი
kn: ಸ್ಪಾರಿಡೇ
ko: 도미과
ky: Деңиз таманбалыктары
la: Sparidae
lt: Jūriniai karosai
nb: havkarusser
nl: zeebrasems
pl: prażmowate
pt: Esparídeos
ro: Sparide
ru: Спаровые
sa: अनुप अभिजन
sh: Ljuskavke
sl: Špari
sv: Havsrudefiskar
ta: இசுப்பாரைடீ
th: วงศ์ปลาจาน
tl: Bakoko
uk: Спарові
vi: Họ Cá tráp
zh: 鯛科

en: black seabream
ar: دنيس أسود
bg: кантар
br: Glazenn
ca: càntera
cy: Merfog Du
de: Streifenbrasse
el: Σκαθάρι
es: chopa
eu: Txopa
fi: tummasargi
fr: Dorade grise, Canthère, Griset, Tanude
hr: kantar
it: orata nera
la: Spondyliosoma cantharus
lt: Kantarai
nb: Havkaruss
nl: Zeekarper, grijze dorade
pl: Kantar
sh: Kantar
sl: Kantar
sv: Havsruda
uk: Кантар
wo: Wersun
zh: 黑椎鯛

en: common dentex
ar: عضاض شائع
bg: зубан
ca: déntol
cs: zubatec obecný
cy: Merfog Ysgithrog
da: Tandbrasen
de: Zahnbrasse
el: συναγρίδα
eu: Txelba hortzandi
fi: kalalaji
fr: Denté commun, dorade rose gv
gl: Dentón
hr: zubatac
it: dentice
ja: ヨーロッパキダイ
kk: Зубан
la: Dentex dentex
nl: Tandbrasem
pl: kielec
ro: Dințat
ru: Зубан
sl: Zobatec
sr: Зубатац
sv: Tandbraxen
tr: Sinarit
uk: Зубань звичайний
zh: 細點牙鯛

en: porgies
ar: فريدي
fr: pageot
hr: prasići
it: porgies
la: Pagellus
lt: Pagelai
ru: бесуги
uk: Пагель

en: gilthead seabream
fr: Dorade royale
it: orata

en: Raw wild gilthead seabream
fr: Dorade royale sauvage crue, Daurade sauvage crue, Vraie daurade sauvage crue
it: orata cruda

en: Farmed wild gilthead seabream, wild gilthead seabream from farming
fr: Dorade royale d'élevage crue, Daurade d'élevage crue, Vraie daurade d'élevage crue
it: orata selvatica d'allevamento

en: Mediterranean bass
fr: Loup de Méditerranée
it: spigola mediterranea

en: Raw wild Mediterranean bass
fr: Loup de Méditerranée cru sauvage
it: spigola selvatica del Mediterraneo cruda